Utah statutes.
10-2-613.   Governing body until next election.

Until the next regular municipal election, the elected officials of the municipalities consolidated into the consolidated municipality shall constitute the governing body of the municipality. The governing body shall elect one of their members to serve as mayor of the municipality and may appoint such other officers as deemed necessary to carry out the business of the municipality.

